Tennessee, session 114, HB0983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Office of Rural
Prosperity Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-203, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, the commissioner of agriculture may
designate an existing organizational unit of the department of agriculture as the office of
rural prosperity and consolidate within that office some or all of the department's duties
related to improving the well-being of rural communities in this state.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0983
003077
- 1 -